Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2379YC (4) 91 da/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 195.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. âDistribution pointâ means a raw milk 3 producerâs dairy farm, a farmers market, or a grocery store. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 3B. âFarmers marketâ means the same as 5 defined in section 137F.1, that is licensed by the department 6 of inspections, appeals, and licensing pursuant to section 7 137F.4 to sell Iowa-produced farm products on a retail basis 8 for consumption off the premises. 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 3C. âGrocery storeâ means a food 10 establishment as defined in section 137F.1, that is licensed by 11 the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing pursuant 12 to section 137F.4 to sell food or food products to customers 13 intended for preparation or consumption off the premises. 14 Sec. 2. Section 195.5, Code 2025, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 195.5 General ââ election by raw milk producer. 17 A raw milk producer may elect to produce, process, or market , 18 or distribute raw milk at the raw milk producerâs raw milk 19 dairy in compliance with this chapter . A raw milk producer 20 may also elect to use the raw milk to manufacture, or market , 21 or distribute a raw milk product or raw milk dairy product at 22 the raw milk producerâs raw milk dairy in compliance with this 23 chapter . A raw milk producer may elect to market or distribute 24 raw milk, a raw milk product, or a raw milk dairy product to 25 individuals at a distribution point. 26 Sec. 3. Section 195.8, Code 2025, is amended by striking the 27 section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 28 195.8 Distribution of raw milk or associated products. 29 1. a. A raw milk producer distributing raw milk at a 30 distribution point shall, upon request of an individual being 31 distributed the raw milk, make available to the individual a 32 copy of the most recent summary of the test that determines the 33 coliform count and standard plate count of the dairy animals 34 retained at the raw milk dairy owned or operated by the raw 35 -1- LSB 2379YC (4) 91 da/ns 1/ 5 H.F. _____ milk producer, as provided in section 195.6. The summary shall 1 be made available at the distribution point. 2 b. (1) A raw milk producer distributing raw milk at 3 the raw milk producerâs dairy shall, upon request of an 4 individual being distributed the raw milk, make available to 5 the individual the heath records of the dairy animals retained 6 at the raw milk dairy as provided in section 195.6. The health 7 records must include all of the following: 8 (a) The coliform count and standard plate count of dairy 9 animals maintained at a raw milk dairy owned or operated by the 10 raw milk producer. 11 (b) The administration of antibiotic drugs to dairy animals 12 maintained at a raw milk dairy owned or operated by the raw 13 milk producer. 14 (2) The health records shall be retained at the raw milk 15 producerâs dairy. 16 (3) An individualâs right to examine a raw milk producerâs 17 health records does not entitle the individual to make a 18 reproduction of those health records. 19 c. If the raw milk producer offers to distribute raw milk 20 in a container, the container shall be labeled as provided in 21 section 195.9, and sanitized. 22 2. a. A raw milk producer distributing a raw milk product 23 or raw milk dairy product at a distribution point shall, upon 24 request of an individual being distributed the raw milk product 25 or raw milk dairy product, make available to the individual a 26 copy of the most recent summary of the test that determines the 27 coliform count and standard plate count of the dairy animals 28 retained at the raw milk dairy owned or operated by the raw 29 milk producer, as provided in section 195.6. The summary shall 30 be made available at the distribution point. 31 b. (1) A raw milk producer distributing a raw milk product 32 or raw milk dairy product at the raw milk producerâs dairy 33 shall, upon request of an individual being distributed the raw 34 milk product or raw milk dairy product, make available to the 35 -2- LSB 2379YC (4) 91 da/ns 2/ 5 H.F. _____ individual the heath records of the dairy animals retained at 1 the raw milk dairy as provided in section 195.6. The health 2 records must include all of the following: 3 (a) The coliform count and standard plate count of dairy 4 animals maintained at a raw milk dairy owned or operated by the 5 raw milk producer. 6 (b) The administration of antibiotic drugs to dairy animals 7 maintained at a raw milk dairy owned or operated by the raw 8 milk producer. 9 (2) The health records shall be retained at the raw milk 10 producerâs dairy. 11 (3) An individualâs right to examine a raw milk producerâs 12 health records does not entitle the individual to make a 13 reproduction of those health records. 14 c. If the raw milk producer offers to distribute raw milk 15 in a container, the container shall be labeled as provided in 16 section 195.9, and sanitized. 17